Utah statutes.
9-8-805.   Collecting institutions -- Perfecting title -- Notice.
(1) (a)  Any collecting institution wishing to perfect title in any reposited
materials held by it shall send, by registered mail, a notice containing the
information required by this section to the last-known address of the last-
known owner of the property.
(b)  The collecting institution shall publish a notice containing the
information required by this section:
(i)  if:
(A)  the owner or the address of the owner of the reposited materials is
unknown;
(B)  the mailed notice is returned to the collecting institution without a
forwarding address; or
(C)  the owner does not claim the reposited materials within 90 days after the
notice was mailed; and
(ii) (A)  by publication at least once per week for two consecutive weeks in a
newspaper of general circulation in the county where the collection
institution is located; and
(B)  by publication in accordance with Section 45-1-101 for two weeks.
(2)  The notices required by this section shall include:
(a)  the name, if known, and the last-known address, if any, of the last-known
owner of the reposited materials;
(b)  a description of the reposited materials;
(c)  the name of the collecting institution that has possession of the
reposited materials and a person within that institution whom the owner may
contact; and
(d)  a statement that if the reposited materials are not claimed within 90
days from the date that the notice is published in accordance with Subsection
(1)(b), the reposited materials are considered to be abandoned and become the
property of the collecting institution.
(3)  If no one has claimed the reposited materials within 90 days after the
date that the notice is published in accordance with Subsection (1)(b), the
reposited materials are considered to be abandoned and are the property of the
collecting institution.
